District of Columbia statutes.
7-743.01

Generally.

(a)

The Department of Health shall oversee the Health Occupation Advisory Committees established under this subchapter.

(b)

All appointments to the Health Occupation Advisory Committees shall be made by the Director of the Department of Health.

(c)

The Department of Health shall provide facilities and other administrative support for the Health Occupation Advisory Committees, as determined by the Director.

(d)

The Health Occupation Advisory Committees shall review applications for licensure to practice upon request of the Board of Medicine. The Health Occupation Advisory Committees shall submit their respective recommendations to the Board of Medicine for action.

(e)

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Board of Medicine” means the Board of Medicine established pursuant to § 3-1202.03(a).

(2)

“Health Occupation Advisory Committees” means the advisory committees established pursuant to this subchapter.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4941
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 202(b), 62 DCR 1884

History

For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 14-28, §§ 4941 to 4947 concerning Health Occupation Advisory Committees, see § 202(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).

Emergency Legislation